Utah statutes.
31A-25-102.   Scope and purposes.

(1)  This chapter applies to all third party administrators.

(2)  The purposes of this chapter include:

(a)  encouraging disclosure of contracts between insurers and third party administrators, both to potential insureds and to the commissioner;

(b)  promoting the financial responsibility of third party administrators;

(c)  subjecting persons administering insurance in Utah to the jurisdiction of the Utah commissioner and courts;

(d)  regulating third party administrators' practices in conformity with the general purposes of this title; and

(e)  governing the qualifications and procedures for the licensing of third party administrators.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

